2000 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2000-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 1st annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. The Pursuit of Wealth: The Incredible Story of Money Throughout the Ages. Go back in time—to the age of merchants, explorers, bankers, farmers, industrialists—then leap forward with today’s information economy leaders and discover how the accumulation of wealth, power, and status has changed over time. Robert Sobel recounts tales of great fortunes won and lost.

2. The Essays of Warren Buffett: Lessons for Corporate America. Warren Buffett’s classic letters to Berkshire Hathaway shareholders are a must-read for investors and business cognoscenti alike. Professor Lawrence Cunningham has selected the best of Buffett’s “plain word” prose for insights on topics ranging from selecting managers and investments to valuing businesses and financial information. Instructive and entertaining.

3. Security Analysis (Classic 1934 Edition) This classic, which Benjamin Graham co-authored with David Dodd, offers time-tested investment secrets and strategies from one of Wall Street’s immortals. Written just five years after the 1929 crash, the messages are just as vivid and just as vital as when they first appeared.

4. Rich Dad, Poor Dad. Ten valuable philosophies to share with your children and teach them what they won’t learn in school: financial literacy. Lessons include the history of taxes and corporate power, and how to work to learn. A New York Times, Wall Street Journal and Business Week best seller, Rich Dad, Poor Dad by Robert Kiyosaki and Sharon Lechter offers parents (and grandparents!) a starting point for educating the next generation.

5. The Cluetrain Manifesto. An inside look at the real power of the web—not the technology but the profound changes it brings to the way people interact with businesses. Cluetrain’s authors, Rick Levine, Christopher Locke, Doc Searls and David Weinberger, look at how markets are getting smarter faster, how networked employees and customers represent a powerful new force in business, and how companies that fail to keep pace with these new market connections and dialogues risk failure.

6. The Innovator’s Dilemma: When New Technologies Cause Great Firms to Fail. Harvard business professor Clayton Christensen shows that even great companies that do everything right can still fail. Their undoing: disruptive technologies and market changes. Learn how even the most aggressive, high growth companies reject truly breakthrough innovations because customers seem reluctant to adopt them—and how the companies willing to capitalize on disruptive forces are poised for exceptional growth.

7. Faster. Acceleration—it’s the feature that defines today’s techno-saturated age. Everything is running faster than ever before. We have become a quick-reflexed, multi-tasking, channel-flipping, fast-forwarding species, and noted science author James Gleick holds up the mirror to it all. So slow down and learn how speed is the new whip behind the acceleration of just about everything.

8. The Silicon Boys and Their Valley Dreams. Come to the epicenter of the .com phenomenon and witness the life and culture of Silicon Valley with prize-winning journalist David Kaplan (Newsweek). Learn what happens when ownership and options replace wages. Meet the entrepreneurs and financiers who have transformed the ”Valley of Hearts Delight“ into an innovation power-region that’s been credited with “the largest legal creation of wealth in the history of the planet.”

9. The Tipping Point: How Little Things Can Make a Big Difference. New Yorker writer Malcolm Gladwell looks at why major changes in our society so often happen suddenly and unexpectedly. Ideas, behavior, messages, and products spread like wildfire. Meet the personality types who are natural pollinators of new ideas and trends that affect the way we live, work, and play.

10. Patient Number One. A first-hand account of how one biotech CEO took on cancer and big business in the fight of his life. This fast-paced account by Rick Murdock, former CEO of CellPro, and author David Fisher, proves that truth can be stranger than fiction. Murdock tells the dramatic story of his fight against a deadly lymphoma that could only be treated with technology invented by his company. But as “patient number one” he also had to lead a courtroom battle that pitted medical miracles against big business.


2001 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2001-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 2nd annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. April 1865: The Month that Saved America by Jay Winik. The dialogue, decisions and debates that marked the final 30 days of the Civil War—the month that saved America. Learn more about the leaders and decisions that changed the course of history and set the nation on a new beginning.

2. The Art of Innovation: Lessons in Creativity from IDEO, America’s Leading Design Firm by Tom Kelley. A rare voyage into the creative process of designing and developing new products. Learn more about what sets great products apart—and how to instill teamwork, creativity and innovation into your own organization.

3. The Attention Economy by Thomas Davenport and John Beck. Attention is one of today’s scarcest commodities. Davenport and Beck bring a unique perspective about how to capture and keep the attention of employees, customers and business partners. Declaring that “understanding and managing attention is now the single most important determinant of business success,” the authors examine what attention is, how it can be measured, how it’s being technologically constructed and protected, and where and how attention is being most effectively exploited.

4. Caring for Antiques: The Complete Guide to Handling, Cleaning, Display, & Restoration by Mette Tang Simpson and Michael Huntley. A resource guide for collectors, Sotheby’s Caring for Antiques offers advice on the everyday precautions for handling, cleaning, storing, or displaying antiques. The Sotheby’s guide also includes detailed instructions to help collectors recognize a variety of conditions that may require attention, from discoloration of a print to the structural deterioration of furniture and metalwork.

5. The Endurance: Shackleton’s Legendary Antarctic Expedition by Caroline Alexander. A thrilling account of determination and perseverance as Shackleton and his team of 27 men endure the beautiful but harsh Antarctic environment. Lessons in leadership, team dynamics and overcoming the toughest odds come to life in an exciting adventure.

6. Generation to Generation: Life Cycles of the Family Business by Kelin Gersick, John Davis, Marion McCollom Hampton, Ivan Lansberg. Practical discussions about family-owned businesses and issues related to business management, organizational skills, family dynamics, and passing on the business to the next generation.

7. How They Achieved by Lucinda Watson. A collection of 25 profiles on successful Americans who have reached the peak of their professions, offering readers insight into the choices and motivations that have led them to success in the workplace and the community.

8. How to Think Like Benjamin Graham and Invest Like Warren Buffett by Lawrence Cunningham. An investment strategy book based on a combination of insights by legendary investment figures Benjamin Graham and Warren Buffett. Cunningham offers a financial perspective that educates readers on fundamentals that investors should know to help value stocks.

9. The Lexus and the Olive Tree: Understanding Globalization by Thomas Friedman. An insightful look into different international systems and the globalization strategies that are transforming world affairs today. For anyone who follows international business and market issues, the book offers valuable perspectives on issues relating to different cultures, geographies, traditions and communities.

10. Seabiscuit: An American Legend by Laura Hillenbrand. The story of an unlikely champion and the two trainers who manage to help their racehorse overcome all odds and emerge as one of the most spectacular winners in sports history—capturing the nation’s attention during the worst years of the depression.


2002 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2002-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 3rd annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Good to Great by Jim Collins. One of the nation’s top business thinkers offers insights into why some companies excel—and others fall short. Backed by five years of research, Collins sets forth a variety of management practices like the “Hedgehog Concept” that distinguish good companies from great companies, and examines how their teams think about technology, change management and other business principles. In head-to-head comparisons, the Stanford Graduate School of Business professor shows how diverse businesses, such as GE and Coca Cola have delivered 7x the shareholder value for 15 years running compared to their competitors.

2. Russell Rules by Bill Russell, with Alan Hilburg and David Falkner. Leadership lessons from Bill Russell, one of basketball’s best who won 11 championships in 13 seasons with the Boston Celtics and coached the team in two of those championships. Using basketball as a metaphor, Russell sets forth eleven clear lessons with practical, plainspoken insights for leading, motivating team members and inspiring performance. A perfect read for any business manager seeking to build or refine their teams.

3. The Weather Channel: The Improbable Rise of a Media Phenomenon by Frank Batten, with Jeffrey Cruikshank. An inside look at how a team of entrepreneurs achieved the implausible and made watching weather a national phenomena. Twenty years after its launch, the Weather Channel has become a cable TV staple, surpassing several top rated programs among morning viewers. A great read for entrepreneurs, both new and seasoned.

4. China and the Global Economy: National Champions, Industrial Policy and the Big Revolution by Peter Nolan. A look at China’s emergence as a major economic power and the impact this will have on world business. As one of just four world experts invited by the Chinese Government to consult on their application to join the World Trade Organization (WTO), Nolan has worked closely with the heads of Chinese industry and with many foreign multinationals operating in China. Important insights for global investors and businesses as they prepare to pursue new opportunities in one of the world’s largest markets.

5. Too Much of a Good Thing: Raising Children of Character in an Indulgent Age by Dan Kindlon, PhD. Kindlon examines the challenges of parenting in the “new gilded age,” offering valuable insights into child and teenage behavior patterns, disciplinary action and other issues of facing today’s parents. Whether raising children in London, Hong Kong, Buenos Aires, or New York, this provides an important guide for families. A Harvard professor, Kindlon is the co-author of the top-selling Raising Cain.

6. Art Lover: A Biography of Peggy Guggenheim by Anton Gill. A just-released profile of one of the world’s foremost art collectors—and extravagant individuals. Written by UK-born Anton Gill, an award winning author with 20+ books published, the memoir chronicles Guggenheim’s (1898 – 1979) passion for life and art, including her role in sparking the rise of the new American Abstract expressionist movement and parlaying her investment of $250,000 into a collection worth an estimated $350 million today. A perfect summer selection for those planning to enjoy one of the major Surrealism exhibitions on view in the United States and Western Europe.

7. Lincoln’s Virtues: An Ethical Biography by William Lee Miller. An intriguing historical look at the moral and ethical cornerstone of Abraham Lincoln’s thoughts and decisions throughout his political career. The book examines how a great man was also a good man in confronting many of the challenging issues of his day. Via scores of Lincoln’s writings and speeches, University of Virginia historian Miller explores Lincoln’s path to leadership—and the world’s respect for his integrity.

8. Elizabeth: Struggle for the Throne By David Starkey. Before the age of 25, Elizabeth had experienced great fortune—and even greater adversity. Noted Tudor historian Starkey takes us through the girl’s learning, loyalties, religion and the relationships that shaped her world—and ultimately, the kingdom she ruled. In this engrossing biography of one of the world’s great women and world leaders, Starkey brings to life a host of characters, madcap schemes and tragic plots, using original documents to underscore the importance of royal rituals, power and succession planning.

9. Here is New York by E.B. White. Written during the summer of 1948, this book is a fond glance back at the city of E.B. White’s youth, when he was one of the “young worshipful beginners” who gave New York its passionate character. Marking the 100th anniversary of E.B. White’s birth, this new edition underscores the magic that makes New York such a resilient city for the millions of people who live, work and visit.

10. Frida Kahlo, Diego Rivera and Mexican Modernism: The Jacques and Natasha Gelman Collection by Anthony White. A comprehensive selection of paintings by Kahlo and Rivera forms the centerpiece of Frida Kahlo, Diego Rivera and Mexican Modernism. This book showcases their work in the broader context of Mexican art, giving a sense of the extraordinary vitality of cultural and artistic life in Mexico during the last century. A timely and popular art genre, the Frida Kahlo and Diego Rivera collection is currently on exhibit at the Museo del Barrio in New York and will later travel to the Seattle Art Museum in Washington. The life of Frida Kahlo will also be chronicled in an upcoming movie starring Salma Hayek.


2003 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2003-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 4th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Beyond Greed and Fear: Understanding Behavioral Finance and the Psychology of Investing by Hersh Shefrin. Behavioral finance, the application of psychology to investment decisions and behavior, plays an important role in identifying how human emotion affects markets. In this book, Hersh Shefrin discusses the role behavioral finance plays in the decision-making of individual investors, CEOs, money managers and corporations with vivid, often humorous, examples. The book helps readers recognize, and avoid, bias and errors in their financial decisions, and modify and, it is hoped, improve their overall investment strategies.

2. The Perfect Gift: The Philanthropic Imagination in Poetry and Prose by Amy A. Kass (Editor). Drawing on the works of Aristotle, Shakespeare, Andrew Carnegie, Alexis de Tocqueville, Gwendolyn Brooks and others, this book explores the power we all have to give, serve, and be philanthropic. Throughout the book, University of Chicago professor Amy Kass guides the reader to reflect on five basic questions: Why should I give? How should I give? To whom or for what should I give? What should I give? Can giving be taught?


3. Memoirs by David Rockefeller. In his own words, the world is introduced to the life and times of David Rockefeller - respected global financier, philanthropist, and ambassador. Learn about the critical role he and his family have played in world affairs and in the history of America. From the second generation in an important family dynasty, Rockefeller details his extensive educational training, vast international career and provides readers with insights into his personal and business dealings with world leaders and those of his father and grandfather’s generation.

4. Manet/Velazquez: The French Taste for Spanish Painting by Gary Tinterow, Genevieve Lacambre, Deborah L. Roldan (Contributor). Showcasing the impact of Spanish painting on French artists during the nineteenth century, this book illustrates how Spanish masters of the Golden Age—including Velazquez, Goya, Zurbaran, and Murillo—influenced the works of revered French artists like Delacroix, Millet, Courbet, Degas, and particularly, Manet. The Manet/Velazquez collection is currently on exhibit at the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York.

5. Geeks and Geezers by Warren Bennis and Robert Thomas. Leadership professor Warren Bennis and Accenture associate partner Robert Thomas examine how era and values shape the character of leaders. The authors look at how leadership traits among today’s “geeks,” or young business leaders who grew up in the advent of technology, compare to those of “geezers,” or business leaders reared during the Depression and World War II. Affectionately labeling the two groups “Geeks” and “Geezers,” the authors explore the hypothesis of a model which predicts who is likely to become and remain a leader, and why.

6. Josephine: The Hungry Heart by Jean-Claude Baker, Chris Chase (Contributor). African-American entertainer Josephine Baker hit the Parisian stage during the 1920s, and soon became an international musical and theatrical icon. Close to three decades have passed since her death, yet Josephine Baker remains a personage not only in France, where she was the first American woman to be buried with military honors, but worldwide. Written by Jean-Claude Baker, the 13th member of Josephine’s famous Rainbow Tribe of adopted children from all nations, this thrilling memoir chronicles her struggle for stardom in America, rise to fame overseas, volunteer efforts during World War II and more.

7. Empire: How Spain Became a World Power, 1492–1763 by Henry Kamen. In a study of the late fifteenth to the mid-eighteenth centuries, Royal History Society Fellow Henry Kamen traces how a small, remote European country emerged as the world’s first superpower. Learn how Spain’s rich patchwork of resources, cultures, and people came together to create an empire of power and economic prosperity.

8. Michael Broadbent’s Vintage Wine by Michael Broadbent. Winner of the 2003 James Beard Foundation Cookbook Award for Wine and Spirits, this book chronicles 50 countries and three centuries worth of vintage wines. Learn what Englishman Michael Broadbent, head of Christie’s wine department since 1966, has to say about hundreds of vintages and thousands of wines. Included in the book are Broadbent’s extensive tasting notes.

9. The Proving Ground: The Inside Story of the 1998 Sydney Hobart Race by G. Bruce Knecht. Journalist and lifelong sailor G. Bruce Knecht takes an exhilarating inside look at the bravery, determination and skill displayed by the 43 yachts that survived the annual 630-mile race, which has been dubbed the most catastrophic race in modern yacht history.

10. Soul Mountain by Gao Xingjian. In 1983, Chinese writer Gao Xingjian faced a diagnosis of the malignant lung cancer—the same disease that had killed his father. Six weeks later, while seeking a second opinion, he learned he had been misdiagnosed, and in fact did not have cancer. Experience Gao’s gripping journey through the remote mountains and ancient forests of Sichuan in southwest China that follows his redemption—and exposes the essence of who he is.


2004 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2004-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 5th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Centuries of Success: Lessons from the World’s Most Enduring Family Businesses by William T. O’Hara. Around the world, family businesses are booming. Centuries of Success introduces some of the most intriguing and longest running family businesses from Europe to Japan, the United States to South Africa. The range of businesses is as unique as the families that have spurred their growth for centuries. There are stories of a family company focused on Japanese temple restoration since 578, a “young” Italian winery founded in the mid 12th century, Turkish cymbal manufacturers, plantation owners, and more. Each story has “lessons learned” for keeping the business going, and the family engaged in the process.

2. Eats, Shoots & Leaves: The Zero Tolerance Approach to Punctuation by Lynne Truss. In an era of email and voicemail, proper communications is critical. Eats, Shoots & Leaves (which derives its name from a humorous misinterpretation of a description of a panda bear) makes the business of communicating interesting and even memorable. This “zero tolerance” approach may remind some of grammar school. Regardless of age, everyone can benefit from this quick, engaging read.

3. Europe Without Borders: Territory, Citizenship, and Identity in a Transnational Age by Mabel Berezin (Editor), Martin Schain (Editor), Contribution by John Agnew. Leading experts in sociology, political science, geography, psychology, and anthropology examine the intersection of identity and territory in the new Europe. Contributors address such topics as how Europeans now see themselves in relation to national identity, whether they identify themselves as citizens of a particular country or as members of a larger sociopolitical entity, how both natives and immigrants experience national and transnational identity at the local level, and the impact of globalization on national culture and the idea of the nation-state.

4. Great Fortune: The Epic of Rockefeller Center by Daniel Okrent. Icons of U.S. industry and New York City, the Rockefellers reign strong. Okrent creates a tapestry, bringing together themes of politics, art and architecture with business and society. What emerges is the story of a majestic suite of buildings that helped solidify midtown Manhattan as a dominant force in global business.

5. George Plimpton on Sports by George Plimpton. With wit and wisdom, Plimpton unearths the essence of sports and competition. Readers will see and appreciate sports in an all new light. From the great game of golf to the gridiron to even a “master” grape catcher who boldly takes on Trump Tower with his rare sports feat. Each story makes you laugh and wish Plimpton was still alive to keep weaving his story-telling magic.

6. Hello Kitty: The Remarkable Story of Sanrio and the Billion Dollar Feline Phenomenon by Ken Belson and Brian Bremner. Japan’s brilliant answer to Walt Disney’s Mickey Mouse, Hello Kitty has emerged as a global phenomenon. Discover how Sanrio, the company behind Hello Kitty, turned a cutesy cartoon cat into a multi-billion global commodity. The company’s biggest coup cited is making the cat as appealing to kids as well as women around the world in their 20s and 30s.

7. Living to Tell the Tale by Gabriel García Márquez, Edith Grossman (Translator). In this first volume of a long-awaited trilogy, Nobel laureate Marquez begins the chronicle of his early life. Entering his world, readers meet eccentric family members, learn of the events that shaped his life, and milestones during his early career as a writer—all within the context of the myths and mysteries of Colombia.

8. Modern Glamour: The Art of Unexpected Style by Kelly Wearstler, Grey Crawford (Photographer), With Jane Bogart. Drama and design have become ingeniously linked, and nowhere is this more apparent than in Modern Glamour. Learn from a pro about what makes for bold, memorable design and just how well individuals and businesses utilize design to create a point of difference.

9. Rambam’s Ladder: A Meditation on Generosity and Why it is Necessary to Give by Julie Salamon. Lessons from a 12th century sage provide a thoughtful framework for examining philanthropy and personal giving. Through stories about businesses and individuals who give, as well as those in need, Ramban’s Ladder helps readers discover more about the power of giving and receiving.

10. Why Not?: How to Use Everyday Ingenuity to Solve Problems Big and Small by Barry Nalebuff and Ian Ayres. The summer is an ideal time to take a break and think about what’s possible, to consider why not. Nalebuff and Ayers, psychologists from Yale, lead this quest of every day discovery and possibility. Using real business case studies and common products and services (from home equity insurance to lotto tickets) they help expose a new way of thinking about business possibilities. Throughout, readers learn a new way to approach challenges and to think and discover that there are clever, profitable concepts just waiting to be uncovered.


2005 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2005-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 6th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. It’s Only A Movie—Alfred Hitchcock: A Personal Biography by Charlotte Chandler. Upon the 25th anniversary of Hitchcock’s death, the life of the world’s most famous master suspense filmmaker proves as intriguing as ever. Learn what motivated the man—and what came to define his style and works which are still revered and watched today.

2. The Diary of Ma Yan: The Struggles And Hopes of a Chinese Schoolgirl by Ma Yan. In May 2001, the diary of a 14-year old Ma Yan was thrust into the hands of a foreign journalist by the teenager’s desperate, illiterate mother. First published in Europe, this young girl’s honest, heart-wrenching story has prompted an outpouring of support, including the start of an educational fund to help Ma Yan and others in her village pursue their education. A portion of the profits for this book will be donated to the Association for the Children of Ningxia.

3. Confronting Reality: Doing What Matters to Get Things Right by Larry Bossidy and Ram Charan. The ability to execute remains the key to getting things done for global corporations. Bossidy (the former CEO of Honeywell) and Charan provide hard hitting insights into the organizational behavior of what drives success—and how companies would be well served to focus on the execution of business models and strategic ideas, rather than on the front-end conceptual stages. From Cisco, to 3M, KLM to Home Depot to Thomson Corporation, the two best-selling business authors use case studies to examine key external variables that drive success.

4. The Wisdom of Crowds by James Surowiecki. Common sense tells us the smartest one in the room is smarter than the collective wisdom of the crowd—not so claims Surowiecki. The New Yorker Magazine business columnist’s insights will provide CEOs and investors alike with a new appreciation of “group think.”

5. Island at the Center of the World: The Epic Story of Dutch Manhattan, the Forgotten Colony That Shaped America by Russell Shorto. When 12,000+ pages of correspondence, court cases, legal contracts, and reports from the Dutch colony centered on Manhattan were unearthed in the mid-1960s, a whole new understanding of New York City history began. Scholar Charles Gehring dedicated 30 years to research this story. Now, Russell Shorto delves behind this vast study to write a historical look at the real roots of New York City—and how its roots set in motion its history as the world’s global finance capital.

6. Managing for the Long Run: Lessons in Competitive Advantage from Great Family Businesses by Danny Miller and Isabelle Le Breton-Miller. With more than 30% of companies traded on NYSE termed family businesses (based on leadership and/or primary ownership by the originating founding family), the category represents a powerful and important part of today’s economy. By chronicling best practices and lessons learned from top family businesses—including traits that many business experts deem as typical business weaknesses—Miller and Le Breton-Miller deliver new insights and inspiration for all business leaders.

7. Three Guys from Miami Cook Cuban by Glenn Lindgren, Raul Musibay, Jorge Castillo, Nancy Bundt (Photographer). Capping a 20-year love affair with all things Cuban—especially food—this trio will bring any kitchen to life with their recipes and stories. The three brothers-in-law deliver 100+ recipes peppered with culinary and social history.

8. Duveen: A Life in Art by Meryle Secrest. With access to some of the world’s most prized art collections and collectors, Joseph Duveen became a prominent figure in art circles worldwide. His adventures as the art dealer to such prominent clients as Frick, Huntington and JP Morgan as well as his misadventures—including instructions to clean a rare artwork that ended in disaster—are chronicled in this interesting biography.

9. Through the Eyes of the Gods: An Aerial Vision of Africa by Bobby Haas. Never before has Africa been seen from this perspective. A remarkable vision and spectacular aerial photographs showcase Africa and its land, providing new insights into the continent as a whole, its vast (and in some cases, threatened) natural resources.


2006 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2006-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 7th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Cirque du Soleil The Spark: Igniting The Creative Fire That Lives Within Us All by John U. Bacon and Lyn Heward. Take a peek inside the magic of the renowned Cirque du Soleil. Learn how the world’s most famous traveling circus finds its talent, creates its performing apparatus and set designs, and orchestrates its standing-room-only performances.

2. Curry: A Tale of Cooks & Conquerors by Lizzie Collingham. Explore the tradition and cultural changes of India through its amazing food. The kitchen and the table serve as an enlightening and historical view into a most intriguing land.

3. Extraordinary Women: Fantasies Revealed - 58 Women of Accomplishment Portray Hidden Dreams and Real Hopes by Ilene Leventhal and Francine Levinson, Photographs by Clay Blackmore. Ask dozens of notable women what they once aspired to be, and the answers range from chess champion (Madeleine Albright) to humanitarian (news anchor Ann Curry). Each woman’s career journey offers insights into the challenges and opportunities that have shaped their lives and inspired others. Proceeds from the sale of the book will benefit the Hand to Hand Eviction Prevention Program and the Metropolitan Police Boys and Girls Clubs of Greater D.C.

4. Field Notes from a Catastrophe: Man, Nature, and Climate Change by Elizabeth Kolbert. Delve into the scientific story of global warming with a New Yorker reporter who will take you from Iceland to Japan. Readers will discover more about the science, the politics and the experts dedicated to addressing this critical environmental issue.

5. Growing Up Guggenheim: A Personal History of a Family Enterprise by Peter Lawson-Johnston. An intimate family chronicle takes readers inside the lives and legacy of the Guggenheim family and its philanthropic commitment to the arts.

6. Humble Masterpieces: Everyday Marvels of Design by Paola Antonelli. From the bar code to bubble wrap to baseballs, learn how hundreds of ordinary, everyday things were conceived, created and commercialized.

7. Judgment of Paris: California vs. France and the Historic 1976 Paris Tasting That Revolutionized Wine by George M. Taber with a foreword by Robert G. Mondavi. The famed wine “battle” between France and California comes to life. Readers will meet the players, learn of their wine-making skills and gain insights into the decision that helped put Napa Valley, California, on the map as one of the world’s premier wine regions.

8. The Lost Painting: The Quest for a Caravaggio Masterpiece by Jonathan Harr. From deep within an Italian archive, a single line in a family’s journal leads a graduate student to the discovery of Caravaggio’s original The Taking of the Christ. Part art history, part detective story, this book traces the presumed disappearance and remarkable reappearance of one of Italy’s, and the world’s, prized masterpieces.

9. The River of Doubt: Theodore Roosevelt’s Darkest Journey by Candice Millard. Trek 1,000 miles down the Amazon with Theodore Roosevelt. After his U.S. presidential defeat, Roosevelt set out to take on and endure one of the world’s most rigorous journeys, and along the way, discovered much about the land, people and ecology of South America—and about himself.

10. A Short History of Nearly Everything: Special Illustrated Edition by Bill Bryson. Tackle some of life’s biggest questions and theories with one of the world’s best “guides.” This new edition provides wonderful illustrations in tandem with Bryson’s always entertaining and illuminating prose.


2007 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2007-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 8th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Caesar: Life of a Colossus by Adrian Goldsworthy. A noted military historian, Goldsworthy details the complexity of Caesar’s character and extraordinary reign, explaining why his political and military leadership continues to resonate 2,000 years later. During his 56 years, the Roman emperor took on myriad personas—from political savant to army leader, from public orator to legal advocate, from prisoner to fugitive. Goldsworthy uncovers them all, adding historical insight about the life of one of the ancient world’s most fascinating rulers.

2. Chocolates on the Pillow Aren’t Enough: Reinventing the Customer Experience by Jonathan M. Tisch with Karl Weber. Cementing customer loyalty is a strategic imperative for business leaders today. Yet, for many it remains an elusive endeavor. Learn from a range of businesses with initiatives that exceed customers’ expectations, create more meaningful experiences and drive measurable market share.

3. The Immortal Game: A History Of Chess or How 32 Carved Pieces on a Board Illuminated Our Understanding of War, Art, Science and the Human Brain by David Shenk. Chess is not a game for nerds. This entertaining book goes beyond diagrams to showcase the larger role chess has played in history and the significance of the game in shaping the competitive thinking of some of the world’s great leaders. Audio book available.

4. Industria Argentina: Contemporary Art in the Making by Cristina Civale, et al. A celebration of 35 emerging artists from Argentina serves as the springboard for this contemporary art compendium. This “who’s who” of Argentine art is the result of input from the country’s most noted collectors, curators, critics, gallery owners and museum professionals, and offers a rare look at the country’s flourishing art world.

5. Leaving Microsoft to Change the World: An Entrepreneur’s Odyssey to Educate the World’s Children by John Wood. What would you do to save the world? Former Microsoft marketing executive John Wood takes us on his journey of personal development as he applies his business savvy to start the non-profit Room to Read. After seeing first-hand the need for books in remote villages in the Himalayas, Wood redirected his passion, giving millions of children the gift of education. Audio book available.

6. Milton Friedman: A Biography by Lanny Ebenstein. Meet the economist, advisor and public figure Milton Friedman and then learn about what shaped his thinking, how his relationship with his wife, Rose, influenced his work, and why presidents and other leaders relied on his ideas. Completed just before Friedman’s death in November 2006, Ebenstein’s research and interviews with Friedman, Rose and close friends of the couple provide illuminating insights into the mind of this great economist.

7. Planet India: How the Fastest Growing Democracy Is Transforming America and the World by Mira Kamdar. The statistics are as staggering as India’s potential power in tomorrow’s marketplace. It is the world’s fourth largest economy, home to the biggest youth population on earth with 600 million citizens under the age of 25, and is set to become the most populous country by the year 2034. Kamar provides timely insights into the history and the present-day rise of the world’s fastest-growing democracy, and what the country’s phenomenal market demographics mean to the country’s growth prospects and the global economy. Audio book available.

8. Revolutionary Chinese Cookbook: Recipes from Hunan Province by Fuchsia Dunlop with Georgia Glynn Smith (Photographer). Recipient of the British Guild of Food Writers’ Jeremy Round Award, Fuchsia Dunlop introduces the delicious and complex tastes of Hunanese cuisine. Food is just part of the journey with Dunlop, as she brings Chinese cooking to life with anecdotes, history and photographs that will have you asking for seconds.

9. This Is Your Brain on Music: The Science of a Human Obsession by Daniel J. Levitin. Music is an experience that spans all cultures and time. Levitin, who directs the laboratory for musical perception, cognition and expertise at McGill University, explores the concepts of music and emotion and considers what makes music universal. He takes us inside the mind to understand why some tunes are so memorable (or forgettable), and what makes some musicians worthy of worldwide acclaim. Audio book available.

10. Thunderstruck by Erik Larson. Acclaimed Devil in the White City author takes readers into another “dual track” thriller, this time plotting scientific controversy and murder aboard a 20th century luxury ship. Unravel the mystery that brings the world’s attention to the work of Guglielmo Marconi, the man who invented radio communication. Audio book available.


2008 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2008-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 9th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Havana: Autobiography of a City by Alfredo Jose Estrada. From cigars to Hemingway, slavery to Castro, the rumba to baseball, Estrada is at his best chronicling the great city’s many attractions. Part travelogue, part history lesson, Havana puts a city facing tremendous change today at center stage for all to enjoy.

2. Indian Summer: The Secret History of the End of an Empire by Alex von Tunzelmann. In the summer of 1947, more than 400 million people won independence from British rule. That same summer, as many as one million died in sectarian violence among Hindus, Muslims and Sikhs, making it a historic time for India, Pakistan and the world.

3. Earth: The Sequel: The Race to Reinvent Energy and Stop Global Warming by Fred Krupp and Mariam Horn. Environmental Defense Fund president Krupp and journalist Horn offer a business-centric prescription for alleviating climate change. By leveraging the market forces of capitalism with technological innovation and entrepreneurial inventiveness, solutions can be found to reinvent the way we use, store and rely upon energy.

4. A Gardener’s Life by The Dowager Marchioness of Salisbury and Derry Moore. Travel to some exotic and elaborate homes for a peek at their outdoor gardens and lifestyle spaces. Inspired and fascinated by her grandmother’s rose bushes, Lady Salisbury dedicated her life to gardens, and her passion shows.

5. Creating a World Without Poverty by Muhammad Yunus and Karl Weber. Nobel Peace Prize-winning author Yunus delivers insights into the rise of micro lending globally, a financial market that some experts estimate at more than $250 billion, or 10 times the amount that has been loaned to low-income individuals to date. Yunus describes how innovative partnerships can make a lasting change and chronicles the partnership between his Grameen Bank and Danone, the makers of Yoplait yogurt.

6. The Man Who Loved China: The Fantastic Story of the Eccentric Scientist Who Unlocked the Mysteries of the Middle Kingdom by Simon Winchester. The extraordinary story of Joseph Needham, the brilliant Cambridge scientist who unlocked the most closely held secrets of China. Needham was convinced the Chinese were responsible for hundreds of innovations—from printing and the compass to explosives and suspension bridges—centuries before they became commonplace.

7. Moveable Feasts: From Ancient Rome to the 21st Century, the Incredible Journeys of the Food We Eat by Sarah Murray. Financial Times writer Murray tracks the long, fascinating journey of a wide variety of foods we eat today. With her historical perspective on a range of foods, Murray brings new insights to today’s careful examination of local food sources versus global food trade and travel.

8. Crashing Through: A True Story of Risk, Adventure, and the Man Who Dared to See by Robert Kurson. Blinded in a childhood accident, Mike May was never fearful of trying anything, from driving a motorcycle to hiking alone in the woods to downhill skiing. Then, in 1999, his ophthalmologist encouraged him to explore a new stem-cell and cornea transplant that might restore his vision. What follows is a story of personal strength and triumph, with lessons for us all.


2009 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2009-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 10th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Panic!: The Story of Modern Financial Insanity by Michael Lewis. Noted author and journalist Lewis examines financial writing that was produced and published before, during and after different economic panics that have occurred since 1987. The results are greater insights into the workings of today’s financial markets and his thoughts on global economic events to come.

2. The Widow Clicquot: The Story of a Champagne Empire and the Woman Who Ruled It by Tilar J. Mazzeo. A global brand leader, Clicquot has a compelling untold “back story.” The heroine, Barbe-Nicole, assumed control of her family’s wine business during the height of the Napoleonic Wars and emerged as a leader in an industry dominated by men and political machinations. The Widow Clicquot gives rightful homage to the business leader, woman and widow from Reims.

3. Outliers: The Story of Success by Malcolm Gladwell. Award-winning author Gladwell asks: What makes certain people become the successful people they are? In Outliers, common notions and beliefs are examined and challenged, using well-known and fact-based trends as the storyline. Outliers provides an understanding of how to include and structure education, training and interactions, so more individuals have the ability to achieve.

4. Twitter Power: How to Dominate Your Market One Tweet at a Time by Joel Comm and Ken Burge, Anthony Robbins (Foreword). Millions of short, 140-character “tweets” are changing the way news and information circulates today. Twitter Power is a chance to learn more about how businesses as well as individuals can harness the power of this wildly popular social media platform.

5. Be the Change by Lisa Endlich. Interviews with notable philanthropists, from Melinda Gates and Connie Duckworth to Paul Tudor Jones, provide insights into approaches for sharing wealth and making a difference. With candid perspectives about how various individuals approach philanthropic giving, the book offers valuable lessons, particularly in a time when foundations and nonprofits are in need.

6. Fruitless Fall: The Collapse of the Honeybee and the Coming Agricultural Crisis by Rowan Jacobsen. With more than 30 billion bees disappearing mysteriously in 2007, and the decline continuing today, the impact on the environment, floral and agricultural industries has been unprecedented. Fruitless Fall explores the amazing working world of the honeybee, how integral these bees are to global food production and flower growth, and how scientists are coming together around the world to address the crisis of their disappearance.

7. Born Digital: Understanding the First Generation of Digital Natives by John Palfrey and Urs Gasser. “Digital Natives,” those born after widespread commercial and consumer use of the Internet, often seem to have a language, and a way of thinking and communicating all their own. Born Digital explores key themes facing this generation, from privacy and safety to attention challenges and information overload, and provides all generations with valuable insights for working, living and growing old together.

8. The Last Amateurs: To Hell and Back with the Cambridge Boat Race Crew by Mark De Rond and Steve Sir Redgrave. Teamwork and camaraderie, relentless competitive drive and big egos make for a great sports story set on the water, with lessons that apply as much to everyday life as to business and the boardroom. What drives the competitive spirit, quest for victory and more is at the heart of The Last Amateurs.

9. A Platter of Figs and Other Recipes by David Tanis, Christopher Hirsheimer (Photographer), Alice Waters (Foreword). Tanis, a long-time, award-winning chef at the Berkeley, California-based Chez Panisse, offers a refreshing, seasonal take on eating local and simple. Colleague and mentor Alice Waters, a vocal advocate of sustainable living and slow cooking, provides added perspectives on cooking a memorable meal for family and friends.

10. The Architecture of Grosvenor Atterbury by Peter Pennoyer, Anne Walker, Robert A. M. Stern (Foreword). With an acclaimed career spanning over six decades, Grosvenor Atterbury (1869–1956) had an architectural vision that left an indelible mark on city planning, building construction and American architecture. Included among his innovations is the creation of the country’s first low-cost, prefabricated concrete construction system—a novel conceptual approach that helped open the minds of both consumers and builders that pre-fab, style and livability can be synonymous.


2010 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2010-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 11th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. On the Brink: Inside the Race to Stop the Collapse of the Global Financial System by Henry M. Paulson, Jr. In this gripping chronicle, the former U.S. Secretary of the Treasury pulls back the curtain on some of the most intense moments of the financial crisis. On the Brink goes beyond the numbers and delves into the brew of people and politics that drove the decisions that were made, and those that were dismissed.

2. Life is What You Make It: Find Your Own Path to Fulfillment by Peter Buffett. What kind of life would the son of Warren Buffett lead? Find out in Peter Buffett’s inspirational story of how he defined his own path and found fulfillment in the world of music. Follow Peter as he discovers that the most important measures of success are ones we set for ourselves.

3. The Facebook Effect: The Inside Story of the Company that is Connecting the World by David Kirkpatrick. The first inside story of Facebook, written with full cooperation of founder Mark Zuckerberg, highlights the company’s exponential growth to its current social ubiquity. The Facebook Effect describes the vision and personalities of the small team of friends responsible for the site’s development, and how it became an integral part of 21st century culture.

4. Written in Water: Messages of Hope for Earth’s Most Precious Resource by Irena Salina. Water is critical for our environment, our lives and our future, but what steps are being taken as this basic necessity becomes increasingly scarce? Written in Water presents a mix of perspectives from advocates for conserving our Earth’s freshwater supply, yielding a well-rounded view of what can and needs to be done.

5. Mark Twain: Man in White: The Grand Adventure of His Final Years by Michael Shelden. On the centennial of Twain’s death, Michael Shelden focuses on the author’s often misunderstood final decade—some of the most colorful years. Shelden follows the venerable storyteller through scores of unpublished pages, showing how the Missouri native wrote his own legend.

6. BlackBerry: The Inside Story of Research in Motion by Rod McQueen. With over 50 million BlackBerrys sold, Canada-based Research in Motion (RIM) has come a long way from its start as a $15,000 loan and a dream. Rod McQueen encapsulates the BlackBerry’s popularity, offering new insights into its origins and development. In addition, the profile sheds light on the entrepreneurial and philanthropic spirit of the company’s founders.

7. The Principles of Thai Cookery by Chef McDang. Enjoy Chef McDang’s passion for Thai cuisine with this generous helping of recipes and easy-to-follow cooking tips. More than just a cookbook, The Principles of Thai Cookery is packed with history, ingredient details and cultural references designed to inspire gourmets and culinary enthusiasts alike.

8. Pops: A Life of Louis Armstrong by Terry Teachout. Few would dispute Louis Armstrong’s prowess in the Jazz world, but his life out of the limelight was surprisingly complex. Author and Wall Street Journal columnist Terry Teachout unearths new source material, including hundreds of private recordings, and shows us what made the legendary New Orleans native such an awe-inspiring figure during the last century, and beyond.

9. Henri Cartier-Bresson: The Modern Century by Peter Galassi. Cartier-Bresson photographed some of the 20th century’s most pivotal moments. For Life Magazine, he covered everything from the revolution in China and cultural changes in Europe to the postwar boom in United States. A companion to the Museum of Modern Art’s early summer exhibit, this chronology by Peter Galassi, the museum’s Chief Curator of Photography, offers rare images and a unique perspective on the iconic French photographer.

10. Fine Wines: The Best Vintages Since 1900 by Michel Dovaz. International wine expert Michel Dovaz takes connoisseurs hrough a century’s worth of some of the most exquisite wines from around the world. He addresses issues ranging from land and climate conditions to grape varieties and aging, providing an insider’s view of what it takes to create these unforgettable wines.


2011 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2011-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 12th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. The Startup Game: Inside the Partnership Between Venture Capitalists and Entrepreneurs by William Draper III. With three generations of venture capitalists in the family, Draper details the inner workings of Silicon Valley-based venture capitalists and entrepreneurs launching promising start-ups. Draper’s insights into philanthropy and venture capitalists—and the unique model he created to help drive the growth of non-profits—engagingly delineate the man and the region that he calls home.

2. On China by Henry Kissinger. Over the past 40 years, Henry Kissinger helped shape China’s modern relations with the West. The former secretary of state brings vast knowledge and professional expertise to this fascinating read about China’s approach to diplomacy, strategy and political negotiations in recent times. In our increasingly global economy, where China’s continued growth and expansion are key, Kissinger’s insights are more relevant than ever.

3. America’s Medicis: The Rockefellers and Their Astonishing Cultural Legacy by Suzanne Loebl. John D. Rockefeller ’s “quiet hobby” started with collecting Chinese porcelains and blossomed into endowing major building projects, while his wife Abby’s passion focused on contemporary art and the launch of the Museum of Modern Art (MoMA). Loebl, for the first time, chronicles the Rockefeller family’s vast collecting and funding reach, and the amazing legacy left to us all.

4. Feast for the Senses: A Musical Odyssey in Umbria by Lin Arison, Diana Stoll and Neil Folberg (Photographer). Follow Arison and Tilson Thomas, co-founders of Miami’s New World Symphony, as they explore the food, sound and beauty of Umbria. The journey takes readers and listeners—through three accompanying DVDs—far beyond city limits into the hearts of the orchestra’s young traveling players.

5. Little Bets: How Breakthrough Ideas Emerge from Small Discoveries by Peter Sims. Low-risk action to discover, develop and test an idea can be extremely effective—as Sims documents. From entertainers to top enterprises, Little Bets explores how a path of focused, quick wins can drive new thinking and innovative offerings to achieve breakthrough results and transform businesses.

6. She Walks in Beauty: A Woman’s Journey Through Poems by Caroline Kennedy. Experience the many joys and challenges of being a woman through Kennedy’s collection of notable poems. Through the works of Elizabeth Bishop, Edna St. Vincent Millay, W.B. Yeats and others, she takes readers on a journey through defining milestones in a woman’s life, sharing her lifelong love of poetry.

7. The Longevity Project: Surprising Discoveries for Health and Long Life from the Landmark Eight-Decade Study by Howard Friedman and Leslie Martin. Friedman and Martin tap the landmark research effort, initiated in 1921, to explore why some Americans are healthy and others are not. They offer insights to leading a long, healthy life—debunking long-held myths and popular ideas.

8. The Corner Office: Indispensable and Unexpected Lessons from CEOs on How to Lead and Succeed by Adam Bryant. The New York Times deputy national editor puts you in the room with 75 top business leaders for candid advice on how to build teams, identify talent, grow an enterprise and manage through a crisis. The Corner Office gives every reader, regardless of experience, the chance to be a student of leadership.

9. Cleopatra: A Life by Stacy Schiff. Mysterious and bold, this groundbreaking female leader comes alive in Schiff’s work. This summer selection takes readers beyond popular portrayals for an in-depth understanding of the woman, her kingdom and the influence she exerted in Egypt and the ancient world at large.

10. The Hare with Amber Eyes: A Family’s Century of Art and Loss by Edmund de Waal. The centerpiece of this captivating memoir is a unique collection of ornamental Japanese carvings known as netsuke. The author, a renowned London-based ceramics artist, traces his family’s remarkable history from Odessa to Paris, Vienna and beyond, with the heirloom collection as a springboard.


2012 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2012-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 13th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Passion And Purpose: Stories from the Best and Brightest Young Business Leaders by John Coleman, Daniel Gulati and W. Oliver Segovia. Whether harnessing cutting-edge technology or preparing for a multi-generational family business, many of today’s students will be tomorrow’s business leaders. Drawing on insights from surveys at the top U.S. business schools, and sharing stories from dozens of recent Harvard MBAs, this book offers insights into the visions and goals of aspiring executives.

2. High Line: The Inside Story of New York City’s Park in the Sky by Joshua David and Robert Hammond. The unlikely story of New York City’s High Line—from rusted railroad to public park. A beautifully illustrated treatise on modern urban planning and a must-read for philanthropists and fundraisers, this book uncovers how two ordinary citizens conspired to conceive and create a monument to tranquility in the city that never sleeps.

3. Diego Rivera: Murals for the Museum of Modern Art by Leah Dickerman and Anna Indych-Lopez. In 1931, Diego Rivera was the subject of MoMA’s second monographic exhibition. In conjunction with a MoMA exhibit installed from November 2011 to May 2012 to celebrate the 80th anniversary of the historic showcase, this collection of panel reproductions and essays brings to light technical aspects of Rivera’s work and MoMA’s history with the artist, who enjoyed an unrivaled status at the center of international debates about public art and politics.

4. Thinking, Fast and Slow by Daniel Kahneman. Renowned psychologist Daniel Kahneman has influenced financial leaders and entrepreneurs for the past half-century. In this intellectual exploration, the Nobel Laureate in Economic Sciences examines the rational and irrational systems that shape our decisions, revealing where we can and cannot trust our intuitions and how we can tap into slower, more logical thinking to prevent the mental misfires that affect our professional and personal lives.

5. A History of the World in 100 Objects by Neil MacGregor. Join the director of the renowned British Museum in London on a fascinating journey through time. Study everyday items and unique artifacts as MacGregor unearths what these items reveal about the societies from where they came, and shows us that who we are can be seen in what we left behind.

6. By Invitation Only: How We Built Gilt and Changed the Way Millions Shop by Alexis Maybank and Alexandra Wilkis Wilson. The founding of Gilt.com is an inspirational story for anyone—from those preparing to lead the family business to those seeking to strike out on their own in the classic entrepreneurial style. Maybank and Wilkis Wilson share their perspectives on the evolution of a simple concept that changed the way millions shop.

7. The Vineyard at the End of the World: Maverick Winemakers and the Rebirth of Malbec by Ian Mount. Winemaking in Argentina improved from worst to first in a 2001 tasting, with its Cabernet Sauvignon/Malbec blend topping some of the finest bottles from Napa and Bordeaux. Mount investigates the history of the country’s signature grape and discusses the innovation and politics that made the country into the Mecca of Malbec.

8. Taking People with You: The Only Way to Make BIG Things Happen by David Novak. The chairman and CEO of YUM! Brands offers his strategy for becoming a successful leader. This step-by-step guide includes quotes, lessons and stories from Warren Buffett, Jamie Dimon and Jack Welch, Presidents Eisenhower and Kennedy, Martin Luther King, Jr., and Colonel Sanders. Small business owners and Fortune 500 CEOs alike will be fascinated by Novak’s ideas on how to reinvent leadership in the workplace.

9. It Worked for Me: In Life and Leadership by Colin Powell. From mopping floors as a teenager to becoming Secretary of State, Colin Powell developed “Thirteen Rules”, which are now the basis for his worldwide presentations on leadership. His storytelling ability and avuncular style give life to the lessons, providing a roadmap to successful leadership from a man who blazed his own trail.

10. Elizabeth the Queen: The Life of a Modern Monarch by Sally Bedell Smith. From her own controversial marriage to those of her children, Queen Elizabeth II has endured personal hardships and public scrutiny since ascending to the throne in 1952. Now as the realm celebrates the Diamond Jubilee of the second-longest serving British monarch, Smith’s biography seeks to reveal the grace, intellect and equanimity of one of the world’s most captivating women.


2013 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2013-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 14th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Creating Room To Read: A Story of Hope in the Battle for Global Literacy by John Wood. Dubbed the Andrew Carnegie of the developing world, John Wood left Microsoft determined to put books—and learning—within the reach of every child. In this enlightening book, Wood shares his business model for making a difference. From launching the Room to Read nonprofit to navigating the process of translating books into dozens of languages, the challenges of running one of the world’s top NGOs are deftly tackled by the man who has helped millions discover the joy of reading.

2. The Soundtrack Of My Life: Clive Davis by Clive Davis with Anthony DeCurtis. Rock and Roll Hall of Famer Clive Davis is the personification of the music industry. Tales from his work as an agent to the famous and sometimes infamous—from Whitney Houston, Janis Joplin and Simon and Garfunkel to Alicia Keys, Jennifer Hudson and Aretha Franklin—provide the backdrop to his personal soundtrack. In this beautifully illustrated narrative, Davis recounts his remarkable path from teenage orphan to his perch at the highest echelons of the billion-dollar music business.

3. My Beloved World: Sonia Sotomayor by Sonia Sotomayor. U.S. Justice Sotomayor learned early on that self-reliance was a core part of her constitution—and would be critical to her success. From poverty in the Bronx to the highest court in the land, Sotomayor’s story is insightful and engaging. The first Hispanic and third woman appointed to the U.S. Supreme Court chronicles the obstacles she faced and her determination to overcome them. My Beloved World is a journey of self-discovery—Sotomayor has defended the American way of life—and penned the American dream.

4. The $10 Trillion Dollar Prize: Captivating the Newly Affluent in China and India by Michael J. Siverstein, Abheek Singhi, Carol Liao, and David Michael. More than one billion consumers are poised to reenergize the U.S. economy—and the world’s. Throughout China and India, the rising middle class is transforming markets, and is poised to become one of the most influential consumer groups in the decade ahead. Examine the wants and needs of these men and women in The $10 Trillion Dollar Prize, and explore how global enterprises and investors are navigating the unprecedented market shifts.

5. Big Data: A Revolution That Will Transform How We Live, Work, and Think by ViKtor Mayer-Schoenberger and Kenneth Cukier. Data—it’s ubiquitous, powerful, and it’s yours. Revered by marketers, management, politicians and scientists alike, data is being crunched, quantified and utilized in intriguing new ways. The results are wide-ranging, from lifesaving medical breakthroughs to layered pricing for your airline ticket. Mayer-Schoenberger and Cukier explore “big data” and its potential impact on our world. They explain how data is gathered and deciphered, outlining the possibilities and the potential pitfalls, including unprecedented privacy concerns.

6. Alone On The Ice: The Greatest Survival Story in the History of Exploration by David Roberts. Join Douglas Mawson, leader of the Australasian Antarctic Expedition, on a trek of miraculous survival in Antarctica. A month-long journey across snow and ice, facing 100-mile-an-hour winds and desperate for food, Mawson exhibited courage and fortitude. An awe-inspiring narrative stunningly illustrated with shots of Antarctica’s extraordinary landscape from famed adventure photographer Frank Hurley, Alone on the Ice will captivate anyone who thrives on risk, pushing their personal limits, and defying the odds.

7. Share: The Cookbook That Celebrates Our Common Humanity by Women for Women International, Foreword by Meryl Streep. Travel the globe’s kitchens, from Afghanistan, Bosnia and Herzegovina to the Congo, Iraq, Kosovo, Nigeria, Rwanda and South Sudan, and explore our interdependence and the relationship to food that unites us all. Flavors, spices and foods define cultures and serve as a catalyst for bringing together family and friends. In Share, these recipes expand our wonder and strengthen our connection to those around us.

8. Kiss Your But Goodbye: How to Get Beyond the One Word That Stands Between You and Success by Joe Azelby and Bob Azelby. Learn from two successful business executives (and brothers) what is possible when you recognize your weaknesses and map a strategy to overcome the obstacles that block your path. Top executives, startup entrepreneurs and newly minted graduates—all will benefit from this engaging read. Identify your personal “but” and learn to remove it from the equation. Kiss Your BUT GoodBye will help you—and your team—become more productive and your business more profitable.

9. Lean In: Women, Work, and the Will to Lead by Sheryl Sandberg. Sheryl Sandberg is a powerful woman in business and an outspoken advocate for women leaders, and her ideas have launched a movement. In Lean In, she recounts her experiences and shares views that are reshaping conversations about how men and women alike benefit when women find success and fulfillment at work and home. Sandberg’s bestselling book examines how women’s progress in leadership has slowed, and it is a thoughtprovoking interpretation of how to drive improved gender equality for the benefit of all, today and into the future.

10. Hopper Drawing (Whitney Museum Of American Art) by Carter Foster. In Hopper Drawing, the Whitney Museum’s Curator of Drawings reveals Edward Hopper through his more than 2,000 drawings, examining how the influential artist’s ideas evolved from sketches to oil paintings. Essential reading for art lovers and Hopper devotees, Foster’s book reveals the meticulous architect behind the inspired painter. Hopper Drawing is the perfect companion to the firstever museum exhibition focused on the artist’s artistic process, running at the Whitney Museum through October 2013 before traveling to Dallas and Minneapolis.


2014 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2014-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 15th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Art & Place: Site-Specific Art of the Americas
By Editors of Phaidon
 From the world’s premier publisher of books on the visual arts comes a stunning volume that will delight art lovers and art collectors. Art & Place takes readers to 60 cities across the Americas to some of the most provocative and fascinating site-specific artworks in the Western Hemisphere—illustrating the inexplicable link between the chosen artworks and the places they reside.

2. Thrive: The Third Metric to Redefining Success and Creating a Life of Well-Being, Wisdom, and Wonder
By Arianna Huffington
 Executives around the globe know that money and power can often only make someone so happy. It’s finding the “third metric” that truly provides the keys to passion, joy and fulfillment in one’s life. In Thrive, Arianna Huffington—one of the most influential women in the world—takes the reader on her own journey of self-realization. Combining a deep personal narrative with scientific data, Huffington formulates a new model for total well-being.

3. Talk Like TED: The 9 Public-Speaking Secrets of the World's Top Minds
By Carmine Gallo
 Go inside the mind of TED’s online presenters. A nonprofit devoted to spreading ideas, TED—Technology, Entertainment and Design—features short, powerful talks on myriad subjects. Public-speaking coach Carmine Gallo pinpoints the top tips of the celebrated community’s most popular presenters. With advice to hone the skills of even well-seasoned executives, Talk Like TED is a fascinating and infinitely helpful look at one of the world’s most common fears.

4. The Metropolitan Revolution: How Cities and Metros Are Fixing Our Broken Politics and Fragile Economy
By Bruce Katz, Jennifer Bradley
 Philanthropists, endowments and foundations are often presented with lists of challenges in American cities—political barriers to growth, lack of economic diversity, immigration. But Bruce Katz and Jennifer Bradley carry the banner for cities that are getting it right. The Metropolitan Revolution highlights success stories from some of America’s most-populous areas and shows that big improvements can happen quickly when people are willing to make small changes.
  
5. The Second Machine Age: Work, Progress, and Prosperity in a Time of Brilliant Technologies
By Erik Brynjolfsson, Andrew McAfee
 As societies progress, those who can best adapt to change have the highest chance of success. MIT’s Brynjolfsson and McAfee detail the vast technological changes that are already underway, and provide a look at the potential changes to come. They also unveil a plan of action to understand, cope with and embrace the transformative nature of society today. For the forward-thinking business executive, this is a book that shouldn’t be missed.
  
6. Things a Little Bird Told Me: Confessions of the Creative Mind
By Biz Stone
 Who better than Biz Stone to offer advice and inspiration to up-and-coming entrepreneurs and next-generation leaders ready to take the reins of the family business? The co-founder and co-inventor of Twitter provides invaluable insights. Combining examples from his own life, principles he’s learned along the way, and true stories from his experiences at Google and Twitter, Stone presents a well-paced, informative personal narrative on the creative process.
  
7. The Future of the Mind: The Scientific Quest to Understand, Enhance, and Empower the Mind
By Michio Kaku
 The secrets of the human brain are revealed in this powerful work by renowned physicist and futurist Dr. Michio Kaku. The Future of the Mind guides the reader on a journey of scientific discovery, illustrating that many facets of the world’s most intriguing science fiction stories—such as telepathy, telekinesis and mind control—may, in fact, already exist. Kaku provides a glimpse into the potential of the future and new possibilities as the human mind becomes linked with modern technology.

8. Olives, Lemons & Za’atar: The Best Middle Eastern Home Cooking
By Rawia Bishara
 Bishara will always be quick to point out that her first name means “storyteller” in Arabic. She deftly lives up to it, taking the reader through tales of her own life and culture, with her beloved cuisine serving as a guide. Bishara has instilled in her book the same warmth and comfort that can be found in her neighborhood eatery, Brooklyn’s Tanoreen.

9. An Astronaut's Guide to Life on Earth: What Going to Space Taught Me About Ingenuity, Determination, and Being Prepared for Anything
By Col. Chris Hadfield
 What’s worse than being locked out of the house? Having it happen 200 miles above the surface of the Earth while traveling more than 17,000 miles per hour. Journey with Colonel Chris Hadfield as he breaks into a locked space station, and learn how his NASA training prepared him for the seemingly impossible. Hadfield shares his insights into thinking on your feet and maintaining calm during even the direst crises.
  
10. The Billionaire and the Mechanic: How Larry Ellison and a Car Mechanic Teamed Up to Win Sailing's Greatest Race, the America's Cup
By Julian Guthrie
 The 34th America’s Cup will be remembered as one of the most exciting and improbable comebacks in the history of offshore yacht racing. But for Larry Ellison, his Oracle Team USA’s first win—in 2010—will always be epic. This story of an equally improbable partnership between an auto mechanic and one of the world’s wealthiest individuals will captivate sports enthusiasts, amateur yachters and fans of Ellison’s helmsman Ben Ainslie.


2015 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2015-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 16th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Creative Schools: The Grassroots Revolution That's Transforming Education 
By Ken Robinson and Lou Aronica 
In his latest work, Ken Robinson makes the case for tapping our advanced technological capital—and creativity—to foster learning and to revamp public education systems. Creativity, he says, is essential to innovative thinking. Through Creative Schools, he offers persuasive evidence, including stories from education’s frontlines, that students, teachers and societies benefit from a curriculum centered on creativity capability rather than standardized learning and assessment.

2. How to Fly a Horse: The Secret History of Creation, Invention, and Discovery 
By Kevin Ashton 
For readers curious about the roots of innovation, Kevin Ashton’s How to Fly a Horse is a conversation starter. An entrepreneur and technology pioneer at MIT, Ashton chronicles the creative ingenuity, persistence and sometimes lonely path creators follow to move from idea to breakthrough. Tracing examples in medicine, science, technology, and more, Ashton argues that creativity and invention are not just the domains of a few and that with focus and determination, we can all be game changers.
  
3. The Resilience Dividend: Being Strong in a World Where Things Go Wrong 
By Judith Rodin 
The strength of leaders, organizations and communities can often be measured by their ability to bounce back from a crisis, observes Judith Rodin, president of The Rockefeller Foundation. In The Resilience Dividend, she offers stories of communities and businesses that have faced catastrophic events—ranging from weather or disease to political or economic crises—and then persevered and come away even stronger. Here’s a fascinating look at what makes leadership enduring.
  
4. Deep Down Dark: The Untold Stories of 33 Men Buried in a Chilean Mine, and the Miracle That Set Them Free 
By Héctor Tobar 
When 33 men were trapped in a mine 2,000 feet underground, they vowed to tell their story together if they survived. Pulitzer Prize–winning journalist Héctor Tobar was selected to write their saga. In Deep Down Dark, he recounts those 69 harrowing days—the miners’ ordeal, the families’ fears, the rescuers’ persistence, and how each person lives with the memory of this experience. With a novelist’s deftness, Tobar depicts the mosaic of human responses to life in danger.
  
5. Every Gift Matters: How Your Passion Can Change the World 
By Carrie Morgridge and John Perry 
“Giving transforms two lives: the one who receives and the one who gives,” writes Carrie Morgridge, who has worked for 15 years with her husband at the Morgridge Family Foundation. Every Gift Matters shares inspiring tales of those who drive community change through giving. Imbued with Morgridge’s boundless passion and energy, Every Gift Matters reflects her own practice of pairing a gift with personal involvement, making this deeply felt account both moving and practical.
  
6. Rain: A Natural and Cultural History 
By Cynthia Barnett 
Blending science and history—and a dedication to the environment—Cynthia Barnett’s Rain traces the evolution of one of the most common, precious and sometimes destructive forces in nature. Beginning with the primordial showers that created oceans and nurtured life, and moving through time to today’s altered weather patterns, Barnett brings a documentary approach to her subject, riveting the reader with facts and a sense of wonder.

7. The Wright Brothers 
By David McCullough 
Although with every attempt to fly, Wilbur and Orville Wright risked their lives, the brothers were determined to change history. Two-time Pulitzer Prize–winning historian David McCullough tells the story of their family and childhood, genius and ingenuity, successes and failures. McCullough includes details from private diaries, letters and family scrapbooks, making this a moving personal story as well as a tale of perseverance, history and invention.
  
8. World Order 
By Henry Kissinger 
Few people in the last century have been closer to the pulse of international politics than Henry Kissinger. The Nobel Peace Prize winner knows firsthand what lies behind recent international accords as well as the global discord that remains. World Order is his call for international harmony and is filled with details that draw from his experience as historian, statesman, observer and friend—an informative and thought-provoking analysis of the challenges ahead.
  
9. Saturday Night Live: The Book 
By Alison Castle 
Devotees of Saturday Night Live will enjoy celebrating the iconic program’s 40th anniversary with this comprehensive look back. Including more than 2,000 photos (some never before published), season reference guides and an insider’s look at a how a live show comes together, Saturday Night Live: The Book memorializes SNL’s spirit, irreverence and astonishing talent. With 500 pages, this coffee table tribute will be a Best Book among the show’s countless fans.
  
10. Where Chefs Eat: A Guide to Chefs' Favorite Restaurants 
By Joe Warwick 
Food writer and restaurant critic Joe Warwick presents a guide to more than 3,000 restaurants, based on recommendations from more than 400 of the world’s top chefs. Listed by city, chef favorites range from neighborhood joints to top-flight destinations. With quotes from the chefs, reviews and city maps, Where Chefs Eat is a go-to sourcebook for the curious foodie as well as the well-seasoned traveler.


2016 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2016-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 17th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. The Third Wave 
 By Steve Case 
 There’s little doubt technology has transformed the world. But where exactly it’s going from here is up for debate. There are few people more equipped to answer that question than one of the world’s foremost entrepreneurs, Steve Case, co-founder of AOL. In The Third Wave, Case explains how and what technology will impact next, and more importantly for readers, the skills one needs to succeed in this third wave.

2. Originals: How Non-Conformists Move the World 
 By Adam Grant 
 Individuality is not a new attribute of success; indeed, the iconoclast-as-innovator idea is well documented. What Adam Grant brings to the conversation in Originals is that ingenuity is inside all of us. It often takes great courage, but challenging the status quo and changing your world or the world at large is not only the arena of the eccentric; it is available to everyone, every day. Originals finds Grant again daring his readers to find the strength to improve the world in their own unique way.

3. Hamilton: The Revolution 
 By Lin-Manuel Miranda and Jeremy McCarter 
 With its genre-bending fusion of musical theater, hip-hop, R&B and pop, the Broadway sensation “Hamilton: An American Musical” has electrified theater goers since it debuted in the fall of 2015. While the musical tells a uniquely American story like nothing before it, Hamilton: The Revolution is the official account of the inspiration for and making of the show from its creator Lin-Manuel Miranda. Featuring exclusive details, photos, interviews and more, as well as the full script and lyrics, the book is an indispensable companion to a show that promises to excite and inspire for years to come.

4. Grit: The Power of Passion and Perseverance 
 By Angela Duckworth 
 In Angela Duckworth’s view, the adage that only practice makes perfect is not only true; it is inexorable. Indeed, the secret to achievement is not talent or genius, says Duckworth, but pure persistence, what she calls “grit.” Through interviews with some of the world’s highest achievers to historical anecdotes to insights gleaned from modern experiments in peak performance, Duckworth reveals that the ability to persevere is perhaps the greatest talent of all.

5. Lab Girl 
 By Hope Jahren 
 Part memoir and part celebration of the wonder of nature, acclaimed scientist Hope Jahren’s treatise on plant life is an exquisite portrait of a life lived passionately, the meaning of friendship, and how, like the lifecycle of the plants, trees and flowers she so earnestly details in Lab Girl, life unfolds when it is nurtured in all the right ways.

6. Map: Exploring the World 
 By Phaidon Editors 
 The history of cartography is a view of the world coming into focus; it is a history of discovery, conquest, ingenuity and innovation. Featuring more than 300 maps from around the world, from the first forays into mapmaking by the Greeks to the incredible everyday conveniences of the Global Positioning System, Maps: Exploring the World is a beautifully illustrated and remarkable account of civilization’s noble attempt to know where it is and where it is going.

7. From Silk to Silicon: The Story of Globalization through Ten Extraordinary Lives 
 By Jeffrey Garten 
 Globalization may be a uniquely modern term, but it’s been brewing for centuries. Through the stories of ten disparate, sometimes obscure figures in history – from Genghis Khan and Margaret Thatcher to Cyrus Field and Andy Grove – author Jeffrey Garten traces the roots of a world that once seemed as vast as the cosmos but is now as close and connected as any small community. From Silk to Silicon is the story of transcendent change and the lessons civilization’s pioneers provide when they dared look to the horizon and beyond.

8. Clementine: The Life of Mrs. Winston Churchill 
 By Sonia Purnell 
 Most historians regard Winston Churchill as one of the twentieth century’s most indispensable figures, but where would he – and history – be without his loyal, whip-smart wife Clementine. While Churchill has been the subject of innumerable biographies, Clementine and her influence is much lesser known. Not anymore. Author Sonia Purnell reveals a woman who in her devotion to husband and country, played an enormous role in the ultimate success of the Allied effort before, during and after World War II.

9. The Sleep Revolution: Transforming Your Life, One Night at a Time 
 By Arianna Huffington 
 It’s safe to say you don’t get enough sleep. What you don’t know is just how destructive sleep deprivation can be to your health, happiness, career and relationships. First addressed in her best-selling book, Thrive, Arianna Huffington devotes nearly 400 pages to the science and mystery of sleep and ultimately the grave consequences of not getting enough of it. You won’t want to put it down – until bedtime, of course.

10. The End of Average: How We Succeed in a World That Values Sameness 
 By Todd Rose 
 No one wants to be average, but according to author Todd Rose there’s nothing to worry about – average doesn’t exist. Yet society at almost every level is designed around the idea that there is some vast middle of mediocrity; it shouldn’t be. That critical insight is the premise for Rose’s book, The End of Average, which lays out the mathematical flaws in the idea of average and offers three principles of individuality that can lead to a better, more satisfying life.


2017
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2017-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 18th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Climate of Hope: How Cities, Businesses, and Citizens Can Save the Planet
By Michael Bloomberg and Carl Pope
Noted philanthropist and former New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg and renowned environmentalist Carl Pope team up to share insights and solutions they believe will address the impact of climate change, from how we manage our cities to how we invest. While urging immediate action, they remain optimistic that people and policy can come together to confront civilization's greatest challenge.

2. Hit Makers: The Science of Popularity in an Age of Distraction
By Derek Thompson
In the Internet age, popularity often seems attainable by anyone, even on a global scale. In Hit Makers, Derek Thompson offers an alternative explanation: Hits are rarely flukes. Instead, hits are meticulously, almost scientifically crafted to be both familiar and new. From popular songs to blockbuster movies, the author explores how “the science of popularity” shapes our culture and our lives.
 
3. Madame President: The Extraordinary Journey of Ellen Johnson Sirleaf
By Helene Cooper
As Africa's first elected female president and 2011 Nobel Peace Prize recipient, Ellen Johnson Sirleaf has blazed a trail of equality and empowerment for women everywhere. Helene Cooper, herself born in Monrovia, Liberia, details Sirleaf’s amazing path from mother of four boys and survivor of war and violence to leader of a fragile nation–an inspiring and memorable story.

4. National Geographic: The Photo Ark: One Man's Quest to Document the World's Animals
By Joel Sartore
With nearly half of the earth's animals moving toward extinction by 2100, photographer Joel Sartore set out to capture what the world could be losing. Brilliant, breathtaking photos of thousands of animals and insects set against dramatic black or white backgrounds bring the beauty and importance of the world's biodiversity to life. The Photo Ark is a mesmerizing tour through the animal kingdom—and a persuasive call to action for all who care about our world’s future.
 
5. The Nature Fix: Why Nature Makes Us Happier, Healthier, and More Creative
By Florence Williams
Our modern digital world has pulled many of us away from nature’s beauty and soothing silence, while we also often report feeling disconnected or down. Intrigued by stories about the world's great thinkers and their communions with nature for inspiration and insight, neuroscientist Florence Williams shows why and how a walk in the woods (or similar escape) is not only good for the heart, but also good for the mind and the soul.
 
6. One Buck at a Time: An Insider's Account of How Dollar Tree Remade American Retail
By Macon Brock and Earl Swift
For over 30 years, Dollar Tree has remained true to its name and mission, defying disbelievers while faithfully serving its loyal, budget-conscious customers. In One Buck at a Time, company co-founder Macon Brock delivers a vivid and entertaining portrait of enterprise and business acuity, from Dollar Tree's humble beginnings as a five-and-dime in Norfolk, Virginia, to the company’s rise in the Fortune 500 rankings.
 
7. Option B: Facing Adversity, Building Resilience, and Finding Joy
By Sheryl Sandberg and Adam Grant
After the sudden death of her husband, Sheryl Sandberg wondered if she and her two children would ever recover from their deep and consuming grief. With the help of family and friends, including best-selling author, psychologist and Wharton professor Adam Grant, she learned that resilience, recovery and even joy are always within reach. For those facing adversity and loss (and for those supporting on the journey), Sandberg and Grant map the steps to help persevere —and eventually thrive.
 
8. A World in Disarray: American Foreign Policy and the Crisis of the Old Order
By Richard Haass
Richard Haass argues that today’s escalating political turmoil has been compounded by—or perhaps driven by—fissures in an old world order that prevailed over the last half century but is now ineffective. In A World in Disarray, he examines factors at play in politics and policies across the globe and documents the need for a new world order. Crucial to this is the role of the United States and the ability of its citizens and leaders to come together.
 
9. Unforgettable: The Bold Flavors of Paula Wolfert's Renegade Life
By Emily Kaiser Thelin
When legendary cookbook author Paula Wolfert started experiencing early stage dementia, her lifelong passion for Mediterranean cooking became a reliable anchor to the world drifting away. Part cookbook, part biography, Unforgettable traces Wolfert's incredible life, documenting her discovery and love for a region, its culinary traditions and culture. Thelin’s celebration of Wolfert’s lifelong bravery and boldness is also a foodie’s education in flavor, technique and delicious ingredients.
 
10. Women in Science: 50 Fearless Pioneers Who Changed the World
By Rachel Ignotofsky
Hypatia, Edith Clarke, Lisa Meitner, Wang Shenyi. These trailblazing women of science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM) along with 46 others are joyfully saluted in this inspiring collection. Crisp two-page biographies of remarkable scientists across geographies and centuries are complemented by playful drawings and fun facts. The next generation of young scientists (and their families) will enjoy this irresistible compendium of brilliant, passionate and tenacious achievers.


2018 Summer Reading List
https://800ceoread.com/jp_morgan-2018-summer-reading-list
Here’s a look at the featured selections for the 19th annual J.P. Morgan Summer Reading List.

1. Black Fortunes
By Shomari Wills
America’s first black millionaires are fascinating examples of business and personal triumph, yet their stories have largely gone untold—until now. Black Fortunes showcases six individuals born into slavery who went on to become titans of American industry. As told here in unforgettable detail, their journeys toward financial success are a long overdue addition to the historical record, as well as a timeless reminder of the power of ingenuity, grit and entrepreneurship.
 
2. Engine of Impact
By William F. Meehan III & Kim Starkey Jonker
For high-performing nonprofits, what are the key elements required to power a successful mission? Noted philanthropists William Meehan and Kim Starkey Jonker believe the seven essentials of strategic leadership are crucial within the ever-expanding landscape of philanthropic giving and investing. They assert that by clearly defining their objectives and fundraising strategies, as well as enlisting strong talent, nonprofit leaders will work smarter—and more importantly, maximize their impact.

3. Alone Time
By Stephanie Rosenbloom
Travel can be a boundless source of wonder and personal renewal—and for Stephanie Rosenbloom, that magic is only magnified when you go it alone. In Alone Time, the celebrated New York Times travel columnist espouses the virtues of solitude, but in an entirely new context. Mixing her own analysis with insights from psychologists, sociologists, artists and innovators throughout history, Rosenbloom documents the restorative qualities of her 12-month tour of Paris, Istanbul, Florence and New York. The result is an utterly unique reading experience that will inspire anyone looking to reconnect with their self and the world around them.

4. The Culture Code
By Daniel Coyle
Whether managing a group of three or 3,000, how can leaders make the most of group dynamics? Using stories from business, sports, the Navy SEALs and more, Daniel Coyle spotlights small moves designed to empower leaders and their teams to achieve big impact. The Culture Code is the perfect leadership manifesto for entrepreneurial startups, established enterprises and all manner of businesses in between.

5. On Grand Strategy
By John Lewis Gaddis
You don’t have to enroll at Yale to gain insights from one of its greatest courses. Here, Professor John Lewis Gaddis offers his unique assessment of global strategic thinkers throughout history, exploring how their personalities, beliefs and intellects informed their key choices. Through expert analysis of past leaders’ glorious successes and grand failures, this book provides lessons for decision makers in any field, as well as for those seeking a greater understanding of the choices that led to our world today.

6. Rome
By Matthew Kneale
This page-turner lays bare the Eternal City, where an enduring beauty belies a history of violence, war and the specter of foreign occupation. Rome resident Matthew Kneale shapes the span of Roman history into one compelling narrative, focusing on seven historical moments that defined the metropolis that stands today. Whether you’re unfamiliar with one of the world’s greatest cities or want to see it in an entirely new light, you’ll want to take this journey with Kneale as your intrepid guide.

7. The Fourth Age
By Byron Reese
Styled as a “guidebook to the future,” the latest from famed futurist Byron Reese surveys the last 100,000 years to identify key points when technology altered the course of human civilization. Reese’s exploration is especially notable in that he argues recent advances in artificial intelligence and robotics represent another key inflection point. A must-read for anyone interested in the intersection of technology, society and work, The Fourth Age examines the crucial questions we need to consider as new developments gain momentum and take hold.

8. Cocktail Chameleon
By Mark Addison
Entertainment expert Mark Addison has spent a lifetime dreaming up elaborate events and other spectacles, often with a signature drink in the mix to help fuel the festivities. In Cocktail Chameleon, he provides 12 variations on 12 classic cocktails, starting with a lesson on the fundamentals of each drink (proportions, technique and ingredients) before sharing the secrets of his own recipes. Addison’s ultimate goal: to inspire you to create your own unforgettable concoctions. Cheers!

9. The Space Barrons
By Christian Davenport
It may prove to be the ultimate example of 21st century disruption: the battle among Silicon Valley entrepreneurs to control the final frontier—an arena once reserved only for government entities. Indeed, several billionaires are now applying their vast resources toward space colonization, and the result is a fierce competition for both new discoveries and business opportunities. While it is too soon to tell who will ultimately dominate a still-emerging industry, The Space Barons proves that a host of cutting-edge business ideas will likely result from ongoing efforts to conquer the stars.

10. Tippet Rise Art Center
By Peter & Cathy Halstead
Featured on J.P. Morgan’s #NextList2017, the Tippet Rise Art Center is an essential destination for naturalists and arts enthusiasts alike. Created by the center’s co-founders, this publication features stunning images of the art and large-scale sculptures on display at the venue, along with equally inspiring lines of verse. If you’re unable to visit the center in Fishtail, Montana, pick up this book for a glimpse at the landscape and artwork that comprise one of the world’s most breathtaking cultural sites.


2019
1. Out of the Gobi: My Story of China and America, by Weijian Shan. At a time when two of the world’s largest and most influential nations—China and the United States—face off in a delicate and tense economic showdown, one man’s journey sheds a revealing light on both countries and their current interactions. Weijian Shan shares his inspirational first-hand account of overcoming immense hardship during the Cultural Revolution in China, as well as his journey become the ultimate American dream success story. Through a deeply detailed and insightful narrative, Shan offers a unique view of his homeland and the country he now calls home.

2. The Age of Living Machines: How Biology Will Build the Next Technology Revolution, by Susan Hockfield. As our global population surges, climate change and new extremes loom, healthcare costs rise, countries and communities worldwide face unprecedented challenges. World-renowned neuroscientist Susan Hockfield asserts the next generation of technological advances to address these issues will be rooted heavily on biology. From bionic limbs to computer engineered agriculture, new biology-rich innovations offer an exciting glimpse at our future.

3. Hilma af Klint: Paintings for the Future, by Tracey Bashkoff. A visionary artist whose work predates some of the more recognizable trailblazers of the abstract movement, Hilma af Klint created graphic, high-impact paintings and works on paper that offered a uniquely spiritual and esoteric take on art. Perhaps aware that her pieces were not of her time, the artist stipulated that the entirety of her life’s work should remain unseen by the public for 20 years following her death in 1944. Accompanying the artist’s first major exhibition in the United States at the Guggenheim Museum, this catalogue delves into the thematic evolution of her artistry, the influences within her life, and the impact she has had on modern art—ensuring the artist and her work are a secret no more.

4. The Moment of Lift: How Empowering Women Changes the World, by Melinda Gates. As the modern world increasingly shifts toward gender equality, women still face critical challenges that are continue to impact society. Melinda Gates, one of the most inspiring and influential philanthropists of our time, shares the stories of the remarkable women she has encountered from around the globe. Gates eloquently weaves key lessons with inspiring anecdotes of women overcoming pressing challenges. The book is a reminder of both the power of story and the need for change, and proof that when women succeed, we all succeed.

5. Literary Places (Inspired Traveller’s Guide), by Sarah Baxter and Amy Grimes. Reading often transports us to new worlds and unexplored places—that is part of the magic of a memorable book and its charming illustrations. In Literary Places, travel journalist Sarah Baxter takes us on a journey to locales around the world through some of the most celebrated and emotionally impactful oeuvres of modern history. From the labyrinth of markets and mosques of medieval Cairo in Naguib Mafouz’s Palace Walk to the sun-drenched plains of Don Quixote’s La Mancha, the tangled streets of Victor Hugo’s Paris to the moody sites of New York City in J.D. Salinger’s Catcher in the Rye, Baxter offers a distinctive and informative guide through time, geography, and the human experience with our surroundings.

6. The Prosperity Paradox: How Innovation Can Lift Nations Out of Poverty, by Clayton Christensen, Efosa Ojomo and Karen Dillon. Co-authors Clayton Christensen, Efosa Ojomo and Karen Dillon tackle one of the world’s most enduring and intractable issues: Poverty. Despite seemingly altruistic intentions of development and billions of dollars of resources, many countries on the receiving end of aid from the developed world have, in fact, become even poorer. Addressing the multitude of factors for this frustrating contradiction, Christensen, Ojomo, and Dillon offer an alternative route to sustainable development, using innovative proven models from around the world.

7. My Mexico City Kitchen: Recipes and Convictions, by Gabriela Camara. Celebrated restaurateur and chef Gabriela Camara has helped transform the food scene in Mexico City with her modern, fresh take. Her acclaimed restaurants—Contramar in Mexico City and Cala in San Francisco—have become wildly popular, a testament to her creativity. In My Mexico City Kitchen, Camara presents the stories and “how to” for some of her most delectable dishes, seamlessly blending the expected (enchiladas and tacos) with the imaginative (savory corn pudding and tuna puff pastries) for global gourmets.

8. Range: Why Generalists Triumph in a Specialized World, by David Epstein. Specialization from an early age in athletics, music, art and science is often touted as the key to becoming an elite master of industry. David Epstein’s research turns this theory on its head. In Range, he shares the secrets of how generalists are succeeding at every age. His work spotlights the fact that it is not necessarily when we start, but more often how starts, failures and restarts fuel our agility, determination and ultimate success. ”Don’t feel behind” is this author’s advice—and with deep insights at the point of where sport, science and technology cross, it’s advice worth following.

9. D-Day Girls: The Spies Who Armed the Resistance, Sabotaged the Nazis, and Helped Win World War II, by Sarah Rose. Before the invasion of Normandy signaled a turning point in World War II, Allied forces faced a seemingly unstoppable Germany. The situation demanded unprecedented action on the part of the Special Operations Executive—a move to recruit women as spies. Thirty-nine women would go on to serve in a program of sabotage, disruption and espionage that would pave the way for an Allied victory at D-Day. As we approach the 75th anniversary of this historic day, Sarah Rose has rigorously researched their stories and pointed a much-needed spotlight on some of the unsung heroines of the war. Her gripping accounts evoke the drama and action of a spy-novel—except they’re all true.

10. Atlas Obscura: Explorer’s Guide for the World’s Most Adventurous Kid, by Dylan Thuras and Rosemary Mosco. Spanning 47 countries and all seven continents, Atlas Obscura is an illustrated guide to some of the most magical and strange places known to man—all with an eye to the young explorer. Glowing caves, massive tree houses, an ice cream shop with 900 flavors and more will captivate and charm readers young and old. This globe-trekking guide is a perfect blend of consumable facts, illuminating history, geography and culture—seasoned with a sense of fun and excitement. Bon voyage!
